Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-802
Application; recording; investigation.

On the receipt of such application in the form prescribed by the Chief Water Officer, the Chief Water Officer shall cause the same to be recorded in the Chief Water Officer's office. The Chief Water Officer shall make a careful examination to ascertain whether it sets forth all the facts necessary to enable the Chief Water Officer to determine the nature and extent of the proposed work of drainage and diversion. If such an examination shows the application to be in any way defective, the Chief Water Officer shall return the same to the applicant for correction.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, § 2, p. 858;

C.S.1922, § 8481;

C.S.1929, § 81-6402;

R.S.1943, § 81-703;

Laws 1957, c. 365, § 15, p. 1239;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 226;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 249.